Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-812.01
Condominium property; divided; added to; deleted; procedure; recomputed basic value.

Unless otherwise provided in the master deed or bylaws, land, buildings, apartments, improvements, structures, easements, rights or obligations, in whole or in part, may be divided, added to or deleted from a condominium property regime by approval of at least three-fourths of the co-owners. Upon approval of such divisions, additions or deletions in writing, an amended and revised master deed and attached plans shall be filed for record and the basic values referred to in sections 76-806 and 76-809 shall be recomputed and filed for record as required.

Laws 1974, LB 730, § 8.